Utah statutes.
76-7-327.   Remedies for father or maternal grandparents.

(1)  The father, if married to the mother at the time she receives a partial birth abortion, and if the mother has not attained the age of 18 years at the time of the abortion, the maternal grandparents of the fetus, may in a civil action obtain appropriate relief, unless the pregnancy resulted from the plaintiff's criminal conduct or the plaintiff consented to the abortion.

(2)  Such relief shall include:

(a)  money damages for all injuries, psychological and physical, occasioned by the violation of Section 76-7-326; and

(b)  statutory damages equal to three times the cost of the partial birth abortion.

